Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.041

Indemnification.

(1) A limited liability company may indemnify any member or manager from and against any judgments, settlements, penalties, fines, or expenses incurred in a proceeding or obligate itself to advance or reimburse expenses incurred in a proceeding to which a person is a party because such person is, or was, a member or a manager, provided that no such indemnity shall indemnify a member or a manager from or on account of acts or omissions of the member or manager finally adjudged to be intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law by the member or manager, or conduct of the member or manager adjudged to be in violation of RCW 25.15.231.

(2) A limited liability company may indemnify and advance expenses under subsection (1) of this section to an officer, employee, or agent of the limited liability company who is not a member or manager to the same extent as to a member or manager.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(a) "Expenses" include counsel fees.

(b) "Party" includes a person who was, is, or is threatened to be made a named defendant or respondent in a proceeding.

(c) "Proceeding" means any threatened, pending, or completed action, suit, or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative and whether formal or informal.

[ 2015 c 188 s 12.]